California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 639, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

23954.

The application shall be verified under oath and accompanied by the license fee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

23954.6.

As used in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 23320, “original on-sale general license” includes an original special on-sale general license; provided, that the fee prescribed in that subparagraph shall not be required in connection with the exchange of an on-sale general license for a special on-sale general license, or for the exchange of a special on-sale general license for an on-sale general license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 29, Sec. 44.   (SB 82)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

23955.

Any applicant for a wine grower’s license shall, at the time of filing application for license, accompany the application with a license fee based upon a reasonable estimate of the amount of wine gallonage to be produced by the applicant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

23956.

Any applicant for an offsale general license shall, at the time of filing application for such license, accompany the application with the minimum license fee required or such larger fee as the applicant elects.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1040.)
-------------------------------------------

23957.

Applications for licenses for the retail sale of alcoholic beverages for premises which are to be constructed or which are in the process of construction shall contain the information required by this article and such other information concerning the proposed premises as the department may require to assist it in determining whether the proposed premises will qualify for a license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 373.)
-------------------------------------------

23958.

Upon receipt of an application for a license or for a transfer of a license and the applicable fee, the department shall make a thorough investigation to determine whether the applicant and the premises for which a license is applied qualify for a license and whether the provisions of this division have been complied with, and shall investigate all matters connected therewith which may affect the public welfare and morals. The department shall deny an application for a license or for a transfer of a license if either the applicant or the premises for which a
 license is applied do not qualify for a license under this division.

The department further shall deny an application for a license if issuance of that license would tend to create a law enforcement problem, or if issuance would result in or add to an undue concentration of licenses, except as provided in Section 23958.4.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 630, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

23958.1.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 23958, the department is not required to investigate the personal qualifications of a licensed beer and wine wholesaler who applies for additional beer and wine wholesaler licenses.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1887.)
-------------------------------------------

23958.2.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 23958, the department is not required to investigate the personal qualifications or premises of a currently licensed person when a license is being transferred between partners and no new partner is being licensed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 477.)
-------------------------------------------

23958.4.

(a) For purposes of Section 23958, “undue concentration” means the case in which the applicant premises for an original or premises-to-premises transfer of any retail license are located in an area where any of the following conditions exist:

(1) The applicant premises are located in a crime reporting district that has a 20 percent greater number of reported crimes, as defined in subdivision (c), than the average number of reported crimes as determined from all crime reporting districts within the jurisdiction of the local law enforcement agency.

(2) As to on-sale retail license applications, the ratio of on-sale retail licenses to population in the census tract or census division in which the
 applicant premises are located exceeds the ratio of on-sale retail licenses to population in the county in which the applicant premises are located.

(3) As to off-sale retail license applications, the ratio of off-sale retail licenses to population in the census tract or census division in which the applicant premises are located exceeds the ratio of off-sale retail licenses to population in the county in which the applicant premises are located.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 23958, the department may issue a license as follows:

(1) With respect to a nonretail license, a retail on-sale bona fide eating place license, a retail license issued for a hotel, motel, or other lodging establishment, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 25503.16, a retail license issued in conjunction with a beer manufacturer’s license, or
 a winegrower’s license, if the applicant shows that public convenience or necessity would be served by the issuance.

(2) With respect to any other license, if the local governing body of the area in which the applicant premises are located, or its designated subordinate officer or body, determines within 90 days of notification of a completed application that public convenience or necessity would be served by the issuance. The 90-day period shall commence upon receipt by the local governing body of (A) notification by the department of an application for licensure, or (B) a completed application according to local requirements, if any, whichever is later.

If the local governing body, or its designated subordinate officer or body, does not make a determination within the 90-day period, then the department may issue a license if the applicant shows the department that public convenience or necessity
 would be served by the issuance. In making its determination, the department shall not attribute any weight to the failure of the local governing body, or its designated subordinate officer or body, to make a determination regarding public convenience or necessity within the 90-day period.

(c) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Reporting districts” means geographical areas within the boundaries of a single governmental entity (city or the unincorporated area of a county) that are identified by the local law enforcement agency in the compilation and maintenance of statistical information on reported crimes and arrests.

(2) “Reported crimes” means the most recent yearly compilation by the local law enforcement agency of reported offenses of criminal homicide, forcible rape,
 robbery, aggravated assault, burglary, larceny, theft, and motor vehicle theft, combined with all arrests for other crimes, both felonies and misdemeanors, except traffic citations.

(3) “Population within the census tract or census division” means the population as determined by the most recent United States decennial or special census. The population determination shall not operate to prevent an applicant from establishing that an increase of resident population has occurred within the census tract or census division.

(4) “Population in the county” shall be determined by the annual population estimate for California counties published by the Demographic Research Unit of the Department of Finance.

(5) “Retail licenses” shall include the following:

(A) Off-sale retail licenses: Type 20 (off-sale beer and wine) and Type 21 (off-sale general).

(B) On-sale retail licenses: All retail on-sale licenses, except Type 43 (on-sale beer and wine for train), Type 44 (on-sale beer and wine for fishing party boat), Type 45 (on-sale beer and wine for boat), Type 46 (on-sale beer and wine for airplane), Type 53 (on-sale general for train and sleeping car), Type 54 (on-sale general for boat), Type 55 (on-sale general for airplane), Type 56 (on-sale general for vessels of more than 1,000 tons burden), and Type 62 (on-sale general bona fide public eating place intermittent dockside license for vessels of more than 15,000 tons displacement).

(6) A “premises-to-premises transfer” refers to each license being separate and distinct, and transferable upon approval of the department.

(d) For purposes of this section, the number of retail licenses in the county shall be established by the department on an annual basis.

(e) The enactment of this section shall not affect any existing rights of any holder of a retail license issued before April 29, 1992, whose premises were destroyed or rendered unusable as a result of the civil disturbances occurring in Los Angeles from April 29 to May 2, 1992, to reopen and operate those licensed premises.

(f) This section shall not apply if the premises have been licensed and operated with the same type license within 90 days of the application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 29, Sec. 46.   (SB 82)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

23959.

If an application is denied or withdrawn, the nonrefundable portion of the license application fee shall be deposited in the Alcohol Beverage Control Fund as provided in Section 25761. The balance of this amount, if any, shall be credited on any taxes then due from the applicant under Part 14 (commencing with Section 32001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code or the Sales and Use Tax Law, and the remaining portion, if any, shall be returned to the applicant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 29, Sec. 47.   (SB 82)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

23961.

(a) (1) If, at the conclusion of the period prescribed by the department for the filing of applications for issuance or transfer of on-sale general licenses or off-sale general licenses in any county in its notice of intention to receive applications therefor published pursuant to Sections 23821 and 24070, the department finds that there are more applicants for the particular type of license than there are licenses available for issuance or transfer under Sections 23821 and 24070 the department shall, within 60 days following the conclusion of said period, conduct a drawing to determine the priority in which all of such applications filed with it shall be considered. No more than one such drawing shall be made in any county in any one year, and no person will be entitled to more than one opportunity to
 participate in such a drawing in any county with respect to an application for issuance or transfer of any one type of license. The number drawn by any applicant shall indicate the priority to be given to the consideration of the application but shall not insure the issuance of a license by the department.

(2) In order to participate in the drawing, an applicant shall pay a fee in an amount equal to the fee for licenses identified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 23320. Any participant that does not file a formal application shall receive a refund of the fee less a service charge of one hundred dollars ($100). Any participant that files a formal application and whose application is thereafter denied or withdrawn is entitled to the refund specified in Section 23320.

(b) If a drawing is not conducted as provided in subdivision (a) of this section, applications for
 issuance of original on-sale general licenses and off-sale general licenses in a county or transfer of the licenses into the county shall be made and considered as otherwise provided in this article.

(c) No person shall be qualified to participate in such a drawing unless such applicant is a resident of California for at least 90 days prior to the drawing. Prior to the issuance of any license, pursuant to such a drawing, the applicant shall present proof of such residency status. A corporation incorporated in a state other than California, but registered with the Secretary of State to do business in California for 90 days, shall be deemed to have satisfied the residency requirement for the purpose of this section.

(d) The department shall advertise, in connection with a drawing conducted pursuant to this section, that participation in such a drawing is available only to California
 residents.

(e) The department shall make the drawing available for viewing via a live video feed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 375, Sec. 3.   (AB 1704)   Effective October 7, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

23962.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (b) of Section 23961, if at the conclusion of the period prescribed by the department for the filing of applications for issuance or transfer of on-sale general licenses in any county in its notice of intention to receive applications therefor published pursuant to Sections 23821 and 24070, the department finds there are less applicants than there are on-sale general licenses available for issuance or transfer under Sections 23821 and 24070, the department may, within 90 days of the conclusion of the period, publish pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code in the county where such new original on-sale general licenses may be
 issued or into which on-sale general licenses may be transferred, notice of the department’s intention to receive applications for the issuance of such new original licenses or for the intercounty transfer of such licenses, setting forth the date, time, manner, and place of acceptance of such applications within the county.

If at the conclusion of the period prescribed by the department pursuant to this section, the department finds there are more applicants for such licenses than there are licenses available for issuance or transfer under Sections 23821 and 24070, the provisions of subdivision (a) of Section 23961 requiring priority drawings shall apply.

No person who has applied in any county for a new original on-sale general license or for intercounty transfer of an on-sale general license during the period prescribed by the department in its notice of intention to receive applications therefor published pursuant to
 Sections 23821 and 24070, shall be permitted to file application for such new original license or for the intercounty transfer of such license in that county during the period prescribed for receiving applications pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1466.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Notices and Protests [23985. - 23987.]

23985.

After filing an application to engage in the sale of any alcoholic beverage at any premises, notice of intention to so commence shall be posted in a conspicuous place at the entrance to the premises. The applicant shall notify the department of the date when such notice is first posted. No license shall be issued for the premises until the notice has been so posted for at least 30 consecutive days. The notice shall be in such form as the department shall prescribe.

Notice of the application for a license pursuant to Section 24044 shall be posted at the proposed premises after the application is filed and shall remain so posted for at least 30 consecutive days. The applicant shall notify the department of the date when such notice is first posted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 784.)
-------------------------------------------

23985.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, in any instance affecting the issuance of any retail license at a premises that is not currently licensed or for a different retail license, the department shall require that the applicant mail notification of the application to every resident and owner of real property within a 500-foot radius of the premises for which the license is to be issued.

(b) The department shall require the applicant to provide notification to the owners of real property, as required in subdivision (a), only if the local jurisdiction in which the license is to be issued provides, free of charge, a list of the names and addresses of the owners to the applicant.

(c) For the notification required by subdivision (a), the department shall develop bilingual notices in English and Spanish. The notice shall include information on how to obtain the notice information in a minimum of three of the predominant languages other than English or Spanish in the state, according to the most recent United States decennial or special census information.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 931, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

23986.

(a) Any applicant for an on-sale license shall cause a notice of the application, giving the name or names of the applicant and the premises where the business is to be conducted, to be published pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code in a newspaper of general circulation, other than a legal or professional trade publication, in the city in which the premises are situated, or if the premises are not in a city, the publication shall be made in a newspaper of general circulation nearest the premises where the business is to be conducted. The form of the notice shall be prescribed by the department. Affidavit of publication shall be filed with the department prior to the issuance of any license. The department
 shall adopt rules and regulations to enforce the provisions of this section.

(b) Any applicant for an on-sale or off-sale license at a premises which is located in a census tract which has an undue concentration of licenses, as defined in paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 23958.4, shall cause a notice of the application to be published pursuant to Section 6063 of the Government Code in a newspaper of general circulation other than a legal or trade publication. Publication shall be made in the city in which the premises are situated, or if the premises are not in a city, the publication shall be made in a newspaper of general circulation nearest the premises where the business is to be conducted. The form of the notice shall be prescribed by the department. Affidavit of publication shall be filed with the department prior to
 the issuance of any license. The department shall adopt rules and regulations to enforce the provisions of this subdivision.

(c) This section shall not apply to any licensee subject to the notification requirements of Section 23985.5 or Section 23987.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 502, Sec. 1.   (AB 593)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

23987.

Upon the receipt by the department of an original application for any license or an application for transfer of any license, written notice thereof, consisting of a copy of the application, shall immediately be mailed by the department to the sheriff, chief of police, and district attorney of the locality in which the premises are situated, to the city or county planning director, whoever has jurisdiction, the board of supervisors of the county in which the premises are situated, if within an unincorporated area, and to the city council or other governing body of the city in which the premises are situated, if within an incorporated area.

Except as specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 23800, no license shall be issued or transferred by the department until at least 30 days after the mailing by the department of the notices required by this section. The department may extend the 30-day period specified in the preceding sentence for a period not to exceed an additional 20 days, upon the written request of any local law enforcement agency that states proper grounds for extension. Proper grounds for extension are limited to the requesting agency or official being in the process of preparing either a protest or proposed conditions with respect to the issuance or transfer of a license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 664, Sec. 30.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Denial of Licenses [24011. - 24015.]

24011.

Immediately upon the denial of any application for a license, the department shall notify the applicant in writing. Within 10 days after the department mails the notice, the applicant may present his written petition for a license to the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 447.)
-------------------------------------------

24012.

Upon receipt by the department of a petition for a license in proper form, the petition shall be set for hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1034, Sec. 2.   Effective September 22, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

24013.

(a) Protests may be filed at any office of the department within 30 days from the first date of posting the notice of intention to engage in the sale of alcoholic beverages at the premises, within 30 days of the mailing of the notification pursuant to Section 23985.5, or within 30 days of the mailing of the notices of the department to public officials as required by Section 23987, whichever is later. The time within which a local law enforcement agency may file a protest shall be extended by the period prescribed in Section 23987, pursuant to a request made under that section.

(b) (1) The department may reject protests, except protests made by a public agency or public
 official or protests made by the governing body of a city or county, if it determines the protests are false, vexatious, frivolous, invalid or unreasonable, or without reasonable or probable cause at any time before hearing thereon, notwithstanding Section 24016 or 24300. If, after investigation, the department recommends that a license be issued notwithstanding a protest by a public agency, a public official, or the governing body of a city or county, the department shall notify the agency, official, or governing body in writing of its determination and the reasons therefor, in conjunction with the notice of hearing provided to the protestant pursuant to Section 11509 of the Government Code. If the department rejects a protest as provided in this section and issues a license, a protestant whose protest has been rejected may, within 10 days after the issuance of the license, file an accusation with
 the department alleging the grounds of protest as a cause for revocation of the license and the department shall hold a hearing as provided in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(2) The department shall promulgate regulations by January 1, 2016, to implement this provision.

(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed as prohibiting or restricting any right that the individual making the protest might have to a judicial proceeding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 502, Sec. 2.   (AB 593)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

24013.1.

If an application for a license is voluntarily withdrawn as a result of any protest being filed opposing the issuance of such license, such applicant may not refile an application for the same location for a period of one year from the date of such withdrawal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 454.)
-------------------------------------------

24013.2.

If an application for issuance of a license at a premises is withdrawn pursuant to Section 24013.1, all verified protests filed against the issuance of the license at the premises in such application shall remain valid against any subsequent applications filed for that premises for a period of one year from the date of withdrawal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 454.)
-------------------------------------------

24013.5.

(a) No license shall be issued for any premises for which a license has been denied or revoked, for reasons pertaining to the premises, unless one year has elapsed from the date the order becomes final.

(b) No license shall be issued for any premises for which a license has been denied, for reasons pertaining to the premises, twice within a 36-month period, unless two years have elapsed from the date that the last order becomes final.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 538, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

24014.

(a) A protest made by any person other than an employee of the department or a public officer shall be verified. Verification may be on information and belief.

(b) A protest made pursuant to this section shall be submitted by an individual and shall be limited to one signatory.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 502, Sec. 3.   (AB 593)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

24015.

(a) If, after investigation, the department recommends that a license be issued, with or without conditions, notwithstanding that one or more protests have been accepted by the department, the department shall notify the applicant and all protesting parties whose protests have been accepted in writing of its determination.

(b) Any person who has filed a verified protest in a timely fashion pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 24013, that has been accepted pursuant to this article may request that the department conduct a hearing on the issue or issues raised in the protest. The request shall be in writing and shall be filed with the department within 15 business days of the date the department notifies the protesting party of its determination as required under subdivision (a).

(c) At any time prior to the issuance of the license, the department may, in its discretion, accept a late request for a hearing upon a showing of good cause. Any determination of the department pursuant to this subdivision shall not be an issue at the hearing nor grounds for appeal or review.

(d) If a request for a hearing is filed with the department pursuant to subdivision (b), the department shall schedule a hearing on the protest. The issues to be determined at the hearing shall be limited to those issues raised in the protest or protests of the person or persons requesting the hearing.

(e) Notwithstanding that a hearing is held pursuant to subdivision (d), the protest or protests of any person or persons who did not request a hearing as authorized in this section shall be deemed withdrawn.

(f) If no request for a hearing is filed with the department pursuant to this section, any protest or protests shall be deemed withdrawn and the department may issue the license without any further proceeding.

(g) If the person filing the request for a hearing fails to appear at the hearing, the protest shall be deemed withdrawn.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 345, second Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Issuance and Renewal of Licenses [24040. - 24051.]

24040.

Each license shall be issued to a specific person and, except in the case of licenses authorizing the sale of alcoholic beverages on trains or boats, or the service of alcoholic beverages on airplanes shall be issued for a specific location, the principal address of which shall be indicated on the license. Except as provided in Section 24044, any license issued for a specific location shall be placed in use at that location within 30 days of the date of issuance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1040.)
-------------------------------------------

24041.

Separate licenses shall be issued for each of the premises of any business establishment having more than one location, except as provided for in Sections 23355.1, 23388, 23389, and 23390, except that any manufacturer, importer, or wholesaler may receive, store, and deliver wine as specified in its license, at and from a public warehouse licensed by the department, without holding an additional license at the warehouse. A license at a public warehouse shall be required by an out-of-state business whose alcoholic beverages come to rest, are stored, and shipped from a public warehouse in California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 337, Sec. 3.   (SB 818)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

24041.5.

The provisions of this division do not prohibit the issuance of an off-sale general license for use on part of the same premises for which an off-sale beer and wine license has been issued and is in force, when the two licenses would be held by different persons, provided that such issuance shall be pursuant to rules adopted by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 826.)
-------------------------------------------

24042.

(a) Any licensee under an on-sale general license or an on-sale general license for seasonal business who maintains upon or within the premises for which the license is issued more than one room in which there is regularly maintained a fixed counter or service bar at which distilled spirits are served to members of the public for consumption within the licensed premises shall obtain from the department, and the department may upon request issue, a duplicate of the original license for each room, in excess of one, containing a fixed counter or service bar and shall post a duplicate of the original license in each room. Failure to obtain the duplicate licenses and to pay the fees, as specified in Section 23320, shall subject the licensee to the penalties imposed by this division for failure
 to obtain an original license or to pay the annual fees therefor.

(b) The duplicate license may be issued to a room reserved for the exclusive use of designated patrons, provided that the department shall, in the event the license is issued, endorse upon the license the terms and conditions under which the privileges conferred by the said license may be exercised, and provided further that upon the receipt by the department of the request for the duplicate license written notice thereof which shall consist of a copy of the request shall immediately be mailed by the department to the sheriff or chief of police within whose jurisdiction the premises are situated and no duplicate license shall be issued by the department until at least 30 days after such mailing. Upon receipt by the department within 30 days of a protest by the sheriff or chief of police within whose jurisdiction the premises are situated, the department shall not issue the
 duplicate license until after a hearing is held by the department within the county or city affected and said hearing shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500), Part 1, Division 3, Title 2 of the Government Code and the department shall have all the powers granted therein.

(c) A licensee under an on-sale general license, or an on-sale general license for seasonal business, issued for a bona fide public eating place may obtain a duplicate license or licenses under this section for rooms which constitute public premises, as defined in Section 23039, and a licensee under the license issued for public premises may obtain a duplicate license or licenses under this section for rooms which constitute bona fide public eating places, except that a duplicate license or licenses for rooms which constitute bona fide public eating places shall only be issued after the department has made the investigation and
 determination required by Section 23787. Rooms which constitute bona fide public eating places shall not be considered public premises, as defined in Section 23039, and the provisions of this division applicable solely to these public premises shall not be applicable to these rooms.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 29, Sec. 49.   (SB 82)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

24042.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, any licensee under an on-sale general or on-sale general license for seasonal business who has a premises with a fixed counter or service bar in one room of the premises for the service of distilled spirits to members of the public for consumption on the premises and who has other rooms on the premises which can be utilized for the same purposes by means of a portable bar counter may elect to request the department to license the portable bar counter itself rather than the additional rooms as provided in Section 24042. However, if two or more portable bar counters are utilized at the same time, in the same room, only one portable bar shall be required to be licensed. The licensee shall pay to the department at the time of the application for each portable
 bar counter an amount equal to the license fee payable for a like period for the distilled spirits privileges of the original on-sale general license or on-sale general license for seasonal business. Failure to obtain the portable bar counter license and to pay the fees, as specified in Section 23320, shall subject the licensee to the penalties imposed by this division for failure to obtain an original license or pay the annual fees therefor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 29, Sec. 50.   (SB 82)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

24043.

Licenses for trains and boats shall be based on the average number in actual operation during the license year of each class of operating units, namely, trains and boats upon which the license privileges are exercised. The average number in actual operation shall be determined as the department may prescribe.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 447.)
-------------------------------------------

24044.

(a) Licenses for the retail sale of alcoholic beverages may be issued for or transferred to premises that are to be constructed or that are in the process of construction. Alcoholic beverages shall not be sold pursuant to the license until the premises have been completed.

(b) A licensee transferring a license to a premises pursuant to this section shall follow the notification requirements prescribed in Section 23985. Nothing in this section shall require an existing licensee to comply with the notification requirements if the construction is taking place on the existing premises of the existing license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 295, Sec. 2.   (SB 844)   Effective September 30, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

24044.5.

(a) The department, in its discretion, may issue an interim operating permit to an applicant for any license to operate the premises during the period an application for a license at the premises is pending and when all of the following conditions exist:

(1) The application has been protested pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 24011).

(2) The department has made a determination based upon its investigation that the license should be issued.

(3) The applicant for the interim operating permit has filed with the department an application for issuance of a license at the premises to themselves.

(4) The application for the interim operating permit is accompanied by a nonrefundable fee of one hundred forty-five dollars ($145). This fee may be adjusted by the department pursuant to subdivisions (d) and (e) of Section 23320.

(b) An interim operating permit issued by the department pursuant to this section shall be for a period not to exceed 120 days. An interim operating permit may be extended at the discretion of the department for additional 120-day periods as necessary upon payment of an additional fee of one hundred dollars ($100) and upon compliance with all conditions required by this section. Any interim operating permit issued by the department shall be automatically canceled when a final determination made by the department regarding the protests becomes effective or when the application for the license is withdrawn, whichever occurs first. An interim operating permit
 is a conditional permit and authorizes the holder to whom issued to exercise the rights and privileges of the license for which the application has been filed with the department. Any conditions for which the applicant has petitioned pursuant to Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 23800) of Chapter 5 shall apply to any interim operating permit issued by the department.

(c) Purchase of beer and wine by the holder of an interim operating permit issued to an applicant for a retail license shall be made only upon payment before or at the time of delivery in currency or by check. Purchase of distilled spirits by the holder of an interim operating permit issued to an applicant for a retail license shall be made only upon payment before or at the time of delivery in currency or by certified check. However, the holder of an interim operating permit issued to an applicant for a retail license, who also holds one or more retail licenses and is operating
 under the retail license or licenses in addition to the interim operating permit, and who is not delinquent under the provisions of Section 25509 as to any retail license under which they operate, may purchase alcoholic beverages on credit under the interim operating permit.

(d) All checks received by a seller for beer or wine purchased by the holder of an interim operating permit issued to an applicant for a retail license shall be deposited not later than the second business day following the date the beer or wine is delivered.

A check dishonored on presentation shall not be deemed payment. The receipt by the seller or their agent in good faith from a holder of an interim operating permit of a check dishonored on presentation shall not be cause for disciplinary action against the seller.

(e) Issuance of the license for which the holder
 of an interim operating permit issued to an applicant for a retail license has filed an application shall not be approved by the department until the holder of the interim operating permit has filed with the department a statement executed under penalty of perjury that all current obligations have been discharged, and that all outstanding checks issued by them in payment for alcoholic beverages will be honored on presentation.

(f) It shall not be a violation of this section or grounds for disciplinary action for any licensee to extend credit to the holder of an interim operating permit issued to an applicant for a retail license or to receive payment from the holder of an interim operating permit in a manner other than authorized herein unless the seller has knowledge of the fact that the purchaser was operating under an interim operating permit. Knowledge of the fact may be established by evidence, including, but not limited to, evidence that,
 at the time of receipt of payment or the extension of credit, the premises operated under an interim operating permit were posted with the notice required by Section 23985, or the holder of the interim operating permit has recorded notice as required by Section 24073, or the holder of the interim operating permit has published notice as required by Section 23986, or the holder of the interim operating permit has recorded and published notice pursuant to Division 6 (commencing with Section 6101) of the Commercial Code.

(g) Refusal by the department to issue or extend an interim operating permit shall not entitle the applicant to petition for the permit pursuant to Section 24011, or to a hearing pursuant to Section 24012. Articles 2 (commencing with Section 23985) and 3 (commencing with Section 24011) shall not apply to interim operating permits.

(h) Notwithstanding any other